Utah statutes.
53-3-806.   Portrait-style format -- Minor's card distinguishable.

(1)  The division shall use a portrait-style format for all identification cards, similar to the format used for license certificates issued to a person younger than 21 years of age under Section 53-3-207.

(2)  The identification card issued to a person younger than 21 years of age shall be distinguished by use of plainly printed information or by the use of a color or other means not used for the identification card issued to a person 21 years of age or older.

(3)  The division shall distinguish an identification card issued to any person:

(a)  younger than 21 years of age by plainly printing the date the identification card holder is 21 years of age, which is the legal age for purchasing an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product under Section 32B-4-403; and

(b)  younger than 19 years of age by plainly printing the date the identification card holder is 19 years of age, which is the legal age for purchasing tobacco products under Section 76-10-104.

(4)  The division shall distinguish a limited-term identification card by clearly indicating on the card:

(a)  that it is temporary; and

(b)  its expiration date.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

